pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Decoração > Acessórios de fragrância para a casa: Velas e queimadores de óleo; Suportes de velas; Abafadores de velas; Cortadores de pavio de vela; Difusores de Fragrâncias; Suportes de incenso; Varetas difusoras de junco
cs: Dům a zahrada > Bytové doplňky a dekorace > Příslušenství k interiérovým parfémům: Aromalampy; Svícny; Zhášedla na svíčky; Stříhače knotů svíček; Vonné difuzéry; Misky na kadidlo; Tyčinky pro rákosové difuzéry
de: Heim & Garten > Dekoration > Raumduft-Zubehör: Wachs- & Ölwärmer; Kerzenständer; Kerzenlöscher; Kerzendochtschneider; Duftdiffusoren; Räuchermittelhalter; Rattanstäbchen für Duftdiffusoren
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Dekorácie > Príslušenstvo pre domáce difuzéry: Aróma lampy; Svietniky; Zvončeky na zhasnutie sviečky; Orezávače knôtov sviečok; Vonné difuzéry; Držiaky na vonné tyčinky; Tyčinkové difuzéry
pl: Dom i ogród > Ozdoby > Akcesoria do zapachów do domu: Lampiony i podgrzewacze świecowe; Świeczniki; Gasidła do świec; Nożyczki do knotów świec; Dyfuzory zapachowe; Uchwyty na kadzidełka; Patyczki do dyfuzorów trzcinowych
hu: Otthon és kert > Dekoráció > Otthoniillat-kiegészítők: Gyertya- és olajmelegítők; Gyertyatartók; Gyertyaszippantók; Gyertya kanócvágók; Illatdiffúzorok; Füstölőtartók; Nádszálas diffúzorrudak
th: บ้านและสวน > ของประดับตกแต่ง > อุปกรณ์เครื่องหอมสำหรับบ้าน: ที่อุ่นเทียนและน้ำมัน; ที่ใส่เทียน; ที่ดับเทียน; ที่ตัดไส้เทียน; เครื่องกระจายกลิ่นหอม; ที่วางกำยาน; ก้านไม้สำหรับเครื่องกระจายกลิ่นแบบก้านไม้
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > インテリア・エクステリア > 家庭芳香用品: キャンドルウォーマー・アロマポット; 燭台; ろうそく消し; キャンドル芯トリマー; フレグランスディフューザー; 香炉・香立; リードディフューザースティック
nb: Hjem og hage > Dekor > Tilbehør for hjemmedufter: Lys- og oljevarmere; Lysholdere; Lysslukkere; Stearinlysveketrimmere; Duftspredere; Røkelsesholdere; Stråsprederstaver
it: Casa e giardino > Arredo > Accessori per profumi per la casa: Scaldacandela e scaldaolio; Portacandele; Spegnitoio; Taglia stoppini per candele; Diffusori di Fragranza; Bruciaincenso; Bastoncini per diffusori
ru: Дом и сад > Декор > Аксессуары для ароматов для дома: Аромалампы для свечей и масел; Подсвечники; Гасильники для свечей; Триммеры для фитилей свечей; Аромадиффузоры; Подставки для благовоний; Палочки для аромадиффузоров
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 裝飾用品 > 居家香氛用品: 保溫蠟燭/油; 蠟燭台; 熄燭器; 蠟燭芯修剪器; 擴香器; 線香座; 蘆葦擴香棒
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Dekoras > Namų kvapų priedai: Žvakės ir aliejaus šildytuvai; Žvakidės; Žvakių gesikliai; Žvakės dagčių kirpikliai; Kvapų difuzoriai; Smilkalų laikikliai; Lazdelės lazdeliniams difuzoriams
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Dekor > Ev Parfümü Aksesuarları: Mumlu ve Gazlı Isıtıcılar; Şamdanlar; Mum Söndürücüler; Mum Fitili Kesiciler; Koku Difüzörleri; Tütsülükler; Kamış Difüzör Çubukları
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Dekoracije > Mirisni dodaci za dom: Svijeće i grijači za ulje; Svijećnjaci; Gasila za svijeće; Rezači za fitilje svijeća; Difuzori mirisa; Držači za mirisne štapiće; Mirisni štapići od trske
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Декорация > Ароматни аксесоари за дома: Нагреватели за свещи и масло; Свещници; Уреди за гасене на свещи; Тримери за фитили на свещи; Ароматни дифузери; Поставки за тамян; Тръстикови дифузерни пръчици
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Decoração > Acessórios domésticos para fragrâncias: Aquecedores de velas e óleos; Castiçais; Apagadores de vela; Cortadores de pavio de vela; Difusores aromatizadores; Porta-incensos; Varetas para difusores
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Διακόσμηση > Αξεσουάρ αρωμάτων σπιτιού: Συσκευές θέρμανσης κεριών και λαδιών; Κηροπήγια; Σβήστρες κεριών; Κόφτες φυτιλιού κεριών; Διαχυτές αρωμάτων; Βάσεις για θυμίαμα; Στικ διαχυτών αρώματος
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 실내 장식 > 실내 방향제 부대용품: 캔들/오일 워머; 촛대; 촛불 끄개; 캔들 심지 트리머; 향수 디퓨저; 향꽂이; 리드 디퓨저 스틱
fr: Maison et jardin > Décorations > Accessoires pour parfums d’intérieur: Diffuseurs à huile et chauffe-bougies; Bougeoirs; Éteignoirs pour bougies; Coupe-mèches de bougie; Diffuseurs de parfum; Portes-encens; Bâtonnets pour diffuseurs en roseaux
en: Home & Garden > Decor > Home Fragrance Accessories: Candle & Oil Warmers; Candle Holders; Candle Snuffers; Candle Wick Trimmers; Fragrance Diffusers; Incense Holders; Reed Diffuser Sticks
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dekoracija > Dodatki za dišave za dom: Grelniki za sveče in olja; Svečniki; Kajfeži; Rezalniki za stenje sveč; Razpršilniki dišav; Držala za kadila; Palčke za dišavni difuzor
vi: Nhà và vườn > Trang trí > Phụ kiện nước hoa trong nhà: Đèn đốt tinh dầu và đèn cầy điện tử; Chân nến; Dụng cụ tắt nến; Dụng Cụ Cắt Bấc Nến; Máy khuếch tán hương thơm; Bình hương; Que khuếch tán bằng sậy
nl: Huis en tuin > Decoratie > Accessoires voor huisparfums: Warmers voor aromatische kaarswas en oliën; Kandelaars; Kaarsensnuiters; Kaarsenlontknippers; Geurverstuivers; Wierookhouders; Rietjes verstuiver sticksicks
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Decorațiuni > Accesorii pentru parfumuri pentru casă: Lumânări și încălzitoare pentru ulei; Sfeșnice; Accesorii pentru stins lumânări; Foarfeci pentru fitil de lumânare; Difuzoare de parfum; Suporturi pentru bețișoare cu tămâie; Bețișoare din stuf pentru difuzor de parfum
da: Hjem og have > Indretning > Dufttilbehør til hjemmet: Stearinlys og olievarmere; Lysestager; Lyseslukkere; Vægeklippere; Duftspredere; Røgelsesholdere; Duftpinde
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 装饰 > 居家香氛用品: 香薰灯/蜡烛精油加热器; 烛台; 香氛蜡烛专用防烟灭烛罩; 蜡烛芯修剪器; 香味扩散器; 香薰座/瓶; 藤条扩香棒
sv: Hem och trädgård > Dekor > Dofttillbehör till hemmet: Ljus- och oljevärmare; Ljusstakar; Ljussläckare; Ljussaxar; Doftspridare; Rökelsehållare; Doftpinnar till rumsdoftspridare
es: Casa y jardín > Decoración > Accesorios de fragancias para el hogar: Calentadores de velas y aceite; Candelabros; Apagavelas; Cortapabilos; Difusores de fragancias; Portainciensos; Varillas difusoras de junco
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Koristeet > Kodin tuoksutarvikkeet: Kynttilä- ja öljylämmittimet; Kynttilänjalat; Kynttilän tukahduttajat; Kynttilänsydänleikkurit; Tuoksujen levittimet; Suitsukepidikkeet; Tuoksutikut